Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.535

Lender default—Treble damages—Civil remedies.

(1) In addition to any other remedies, if a lender defaults on any of the reverse mortgage loan terms and fails to cure an actual default after notice as specified in the loan documents, the borrower, or the borrower's estate, is entitled to treble damages.

(2) An arrangement, transfer, or lien subject to this chapter is not invalidated solely because of the failure of a lender to comply with any provision of this chapter. However, this section does not preclude the application of any other existing civil remedies provided by law.

(3) A violation of federal legal requirements for an FHA-approved reverse mortgage as defined in RCW 31.04.505(1) constitutes a violation of this chapter.

[ 2009 c 149 s 7.]